Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB552.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 79DEMERGENCY RESPONSE PAYMENTSec.79D01. Definitions.79D02. Reimbursement.79D03. Procedure.79D04. Penalties.79D05. Cost of appeal.79D06. Reports.79D07. Guidelines.§ 79D01. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Actual and reasonable response costs." An amount that is consistent with what a reasonable person would pay in the same or similar circumstances for the same business or for the same or similar item. This term shall not include any costs for labor."Emergency." An incident that requires responsive, coordinated action to protect an individual, the environment, critical infrastructure or property, and the responsive, coordinated action is the result of an official dispatch."Fire company." A volunteer fire company located in this Commonwealth."Incident commander." An individual responsible for all incident-related activities as described in the National Incident Management System."Insurer." A company, association or exchange defined by section 101 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Official dispatch." The dispatch of a fire company to an emergency by a public safety answering point or a response to a special call or request from an incident commander for assistance with an emergency."Volunteer fire company." As defined in section 7802 (relating to definitions).§ 79D02. Reimbursement.(a) Expenses.-- A person involved in an emergency that necessitates an official dispatch of a fire company shall be liable for the actual and reasonable response costs incurred by 20250SB0552PN0545 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the fire company for services rendered . (b) Costs.--An insurer shall be responsible for reimbursing a fire company for actual and reasonable response costs as provided for under this chapter.§ 79D03. Procedure.(a) Billing.--A fire company is authorized to seek reimbursement from an insurer for actual and reasonable response costs related to an emergency as provided for under this section. A bill for reimbursement must clearly itemize the costs that have been incurred as provided for under section 79D07 (relating to guidelines).(b) Reimbursement.--A bill for actual and reasonable response costs shall be submitted for payment by a fire company to an insurer. Notwithstanding section 79D07, submission of a bill to an insurer shall not relieve a person under section 79D02 (relating to reimbursement) from financial responsibility if an insurer denies payment of the bill.(c) Failure to pay.--A fire company that submits to an insurer a bill for actual and reasonable response costs as provided for under this section may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the amount of the actual and reasonable response costs from a person under section 79D02 if the insurer fails to pay the amount of the bill.(d) Bills from multiple fire companies.--If more than one fire company incurs actual and reasonable response costs in a response to an emergency, only one bill may be submitted by the fire companies, if the fire companies were requested by an incident commander or through a public safety answering point for mutual aid purposes . (e) Insurance.--An insurer may not require a fire company to 20250SB0552PN0545 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contract with the insurer to receive payment under this chapter.§ 79D04. Penalties.A fire company filing a false request for reimbursement commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $100. A fire company shall pay a fine of $1,000 for each subsequent offense.§ 79D05. Cost of appeal.A person who loses an appeal relating to reimbursement of actual and reasonable response costs shall pay all costs of the appeal.§ 79D06. Reports.A police report created as a result of an emergency response under this chapter shall be released to a requesting party within 30 days of the report's creation.§ 79D07. Guidelines.The reimbursement rate shall be in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Ch. 68 (relating to disaster relief) and shall be published by the Office of the State Fire Commissioner on its publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0552PN0545 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920